th: วัสดุที่ใช้เป็นฐานของอาร์ม: ผ้าแคนวาส; ผ้าฝ้าย; ผ้าเดนิม; หนังเทียม; ผ้าสักหลาด; หนัง; ไนลอน; โพลีเอสเตอร์; ผ้าซาติน; ผ้าทวิล; ผ้ากำมะหยี่; ขนสัตว์; อื่นๆ
sl-SI: Osnovni material emblemske krpe: Platno; Bombaž; Denim; Umetno usnje; Polst; Usnje; Najlon; Poliester; Saten; Keper; Žamet; Volna; Drugo
en: Patch base material: Canvas; Cotton; Denim; Faux leather; Felt; Leather; Nylon; Polyester; Satin; Twill; Velvet; Wool; Other
it: Materiale base della toppa: Tela; Cotone; Denim; Similpelle; Feltro; Pelle; Nylon; Poliestere; Raso; Twill; Velluto; Lana; Altro
ru: Материал основы патча: Канвас; Хлопок; Деним; Искусственная кожа; Фетр; Кожа; Нейлон; Полиэстер; Сатин; Твил; Бархат; Шерсть; Другое
vi: Chất liệu nền của miếng vá: Canvas; Cotton; Denim; Giả da; Vải nỉ; Da; Nylon; Polyester; Satin; Vải twill; Nhung; Len; Khác
cs: Základní materiál nášivky: Plátno; Bavlna; Džínovina; Umělá kůže; Plsť; Kůže; Nylon; Polyester; Satén; Kepr; Samet; Vlna; Ostatní
nl: Basismateriaal patch: Canvas; Katoen; Denim; Kunstleer; Vilt; Leer; Nylon; Polyester; Satijn; Keperstof; Fluweel; Wol; Overig
ja: パッチベース素材: キャンバス; コットン; デニム; フェイクレザー; フェルト; レザー; ナイロン; ポリエステル; サテン; ツイル; ベルベット; ウール; その他
de: Hauptmaterial des Patches: Canvas; Baumwolle; Denim; Kunstleder; Filz; Leder; Nylon; Polyester; Satin; Twill; Samt; Wolle; Sonstige
es: Material de base del parche: Lona; Algodón; Mezclilla; Piel sintética; Fieltro; Cuero; Nailon; Poliéster; Satén; Sarga; Terciopelo; Lana; Otro
zh-CN: 贴片基材: 帆布; 棉; 牛仔布; 人造皮革; 毛毡; 皮革; 尼龙; 聚酯纤维; 缎面; 斜纹布; 天鹅绒; 羊毛; 其他
sk-SK: Základný materiál pre nášivky: Plátno; Bavlna; Rifľovina; Umelá koža; Plsť; Koža; Nylon; Polyester; Satén; Keper; Zamat; Vlna; Iné
el: Υλικό βάσης επιθέματος: Καμβάς; Βαμβάκι; Τζιν; Συνθετικό δέρμα; Τσόχα; Δέρμα; Νάιλον; Πολυεστέρας; Σατέν; Twill; Βελούδο; Μαλλί; Άλλο
nb: Hovedmateriale for lapp: Lerret; Bomull; Denim; Kunstskinn; Filt; Skinn; Nylon; Polyester; Sateng; Twill; Fløyel; Ull; Annet
hu: Felvarró alap anyaga: Vászon; Pamut; Farmer; Műbőr; Filc; Bőr; Nejlon; Poliészter; Szatén; Sávoly; Bársony; Gyapjú; Egyéb
pl: Materiał podstawowy naszywki: Płótno; Bawełna; Denim; Sztuczna skóra; Filc; Skóra; Nylon; Poliester; Satyna; Diagonal; Aksamit; Wełna; Inne
pt-PT: Material da base do aplique: Lona; Algodão; Ganga; Imitação de pele; Feltro; Pele; Nylon; Poliéster; Cetim; Sarja; Veludo; Lã; Outro
da: Basismateriale for patch: Lærred; Bomuld; Denim; Kunstlæder; Filt; Læder; Nylon; Polyester; Satin; Twill; Velour; Uld; Andet
ro-RO: Material de bază pentru plasture: Pânză; Bumbac; Denim; Piele ecologică; Pâslă; Piele; Nailon; Poliester; Satin; Twill; Catifea; Lână; Altele
tr: Yama taban malzemesi: Kanvas; Pamuk; Denim; Suni deri; Keçe; Deri; Naylon; Polyester; Saten; Dimi; Kadife; Yün; Diğer
bg-BG: Материал на базата на нашивката: Платно; Памук; Деним; Изкуствена кожа; Филц; Кожа; Найлон; Полиестер; Сатен; Кепър; Кадифе; Вълна; Друго
fi: Lapun pohjan materiaali: Kanvas; Puuvilla; Farkkukangas; Tekonahka; Huopa; Nahka; Nailon; Polyesteri; Satiini; Tvilli; Sametti; Villa; Muu
hr-HR: Materijal podloge naljepnice: Platno; Pamuk; Traper; Umjetna koža; Filc; Koža; Najlon; Poliester; Saten; Keper; Baršun; Vuna; Ostalo
zh-TW: 貼片底面材質: 帆布; 棉布; 丹寧; 合成皮; 毛氈; 皮革; 尼龍; 聚酯纖維; 緞面; 斜紋布; 天鵝絨; 羊毛; 其他
ko: 패치 베이스 소재: 캔버스; 면; 데님; 인조 가죽; 펠트; 가죽; 나일론; 폴리에스테르; 새틴; 트윌; 벨벳; 울; 기타
lt-LT: Lopo pagrindo medžiaga: Drobė; Medvilnė; Džinsas; Dirbtinė oda; Veltinis; Oda; Nailonas; Poliesteris; Satinas; Ruoželis; Aksomas; Vilna; Kita
pt-BR: Patch, material de base: Lona; Algodão; Jeans; Couro sintético; Feltro; Couro; Nylon; Poliéster; Cetim; Sarja; Veludo; Lã; Outro
sv: Tygmärkets basväv: Kanvas; Bomull; Denim; Konstläder; Filt; Läder; Nylon; Polyester; Satin; Twill; Sammet; Ull; Övrigt
fr: Matériau de base du patch: Toile; Coton; Denim; Similicuir; Feutre; Cuir; Nylon; Polyester; Satin; Sergé; Velours; Laine; Autre